en: Absorbency level: Heavy; Light; Moderate; Overnight; Regular; Super; Other
vi: Mức độ hấp thụ: Nặng; Nhẹ; Vừa phải; Suốt đêm; Loại thông thường; Siêu; Khác
th: ระดับการดูดซึม: ตึงมาก; ตึงเล็กน้อย; ปานกลาง; ตลอดคืน; แบบปกติ; ซูเปอร์; อื่นๆ
tr: Emicilik Seviyesi: Ağır; Hafif; Ortalama; Gece boyu; Normal; Süper; Diğer
zh-TW: 吸收能力等級: 重型; 輕型; 中; 過夜; 一般; 良好的; 其他
sv: Absorptionsnivå: Tung; Lätt; Måttlig; Över natten; Vanligt; Super; Övrigt
ru: Впитываемость: Сильная; Слабая; Средняя; Ночная; Обычная; Супер; Другая
ro-RO: Nivel absorbție: Crescut; Scăzut; Moderat; Peste noapte; Normal; Super; Altele
bg-BG: Ниво на абсорбция: Тежък; Лек; Умерен; За една нощ; Редовен; Супер; Други
lt-LT: Absorbcijos lygis: Stiprus; Lengvas; Vidutinis; Pernakt; Normalus; Super; Kita
pt-BR: Nível de absorção: Pesado; Leve; Moderado; Durante a noite; Regular; Super; Outro
da: Absorberingsniveau: Tung; Let; Moderat; Natten over; Almindelig; Super; Andet
sl-SI: Stopnja vpojnosti: Močna; Rahla; Zmerna; Čez noč; Običajna; Izjemno močna; Drugo
fi: Imevyystaso: Raskas; Kevyt; Kohtalainen; Yli yön; Tavallinen; Super; Muu
pl: Poziom chłonności: Ciężki; Lekki; Umiarkowany; Nocny; Zwyczajne; Super; Inne
de: Saugfähigkeitsgrad: Schwer; Leicht; Mäßig; Über Nacht; Normal; Super; Sonstiges
cs: Úroveň savosti: Těžká; Lehká; Průměrný; Přes noc; Běžná; Super; Jiné
hr-HR: Razina upijanja: Obilno; Lagano; Umjereno; Noćni; Regularni; Super; Ostalo
zh-CN: 吸水性等级: 重; 轻; 中速; 过夜; 普通; 超大; 其他
ja: 吸収レベル: 重い; 軽い; 中程度; 一晩; レギュラー; スーパー; その他
hu: Felszívódási szint: Magas; Alacsony; Mérsékelt; Éjszakai; Normál; Szuper; Egyéb
fr: Niveau d’absorption: Lourd; Léger; Modéré; Pendant la nuit; Normale; Super; Autre
it: Livello di assorbenza: Pesante; Leggero; Moderato; Durante la notte; Regular; Super; Altro
nl: Absorptieniveau: Zwaar; Licht; Gemiddeld; Nacht; Normaal; Super; Andere
es: Nivel de absorbencia: Pesado; Ligero; Moderado; Durante la noche; Regular; Súper; Otros
sk-SK: Úroveň absorpcie: Ťažký; Svetlý; Mierny; Jednodňový; Bežný; Super; Iné
el: Επίπεδο απορρόφησης: Μεγάλη; Ελαφριά; Μέτρια; Ολονύκτια; Κανονική; Μέγιστη; Άλλο
nb: Absorberingsnivå: Tung; Lett; Moderat; Over natten; Vanlig; Super; Annet
pt-PT: Nível de absorção: Elevada; Ligeira; Moderado; De um dia para o outro; Tradicionais; Super; Outro
ko: 흡수성 수준: 무거움; 가벼움; 보통; 오버나이트; 레귤러; 슈퍼; 기타